District of Columbia statutes.
10-602

Municipal Center — Rental.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized in his discretion to rent, until their removal becomes necessary, at fair rental values, buildings acquired by the District in the municipal center, and to use such part of the rentals heretofore and hereafter collected as may be necessary for expenses of collection, repairs, and alterations to buildings by day labor or otherwise, expenses of moving and preservation and operating expenses of such buildings as may continue in private occupancy, the balance of the rentals to be covered into the Treasury to the credit of the revenues of the District of Columbia.

July 3, 1930, 46 Stat. 957, ch. 848
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.
1973 Ed., § 9-202.
1981 Ed., § 9-202.